old/apertium-tg-fa.fa.dix.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="utf-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ابپتثچجحَخِديذةرزژسشصضطظعغقکگلىمنهیئونكفهؤپءٔأآ</alphabet>
  <xi:include xmlns:xi="http://www.w3.org/2001/XInclude" href="apertium-tg-fa.symbols.xml"/>
  <pardefs>

<!--
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[۰۱۲۳۴۵۶۷۸۹]+([.,][۰۱۲۳۴۵۶۷۸۹]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
-->
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>،</l>
          <r>،<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__ی">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ی</l>
          <r><j/>ی<s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__یی">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یی</l>
          <r><j/>یی<s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__ای">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌ای</l>
          <r><j/>ای<s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l><b/>ای</l>
          <r><j/>ای<s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__ه">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ه</l>
          <r><j/>ه<s n="enc"/><s n="izo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__را">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>را</l>
          <r><j/>را<s n="enc"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="P__ن">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ن‌</l>
          <r>ن<s n="neg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ن</l>
          <r>ن<s n="neg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="P__prefixes">
      <e>
        <par n="P__ن"/>
        <p>
          <l>می‌</l>
          <r>می<s n="me"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="P__ن"/>
        <p>
          <l>ﺏ‌</l>
          <r>ﺏ<s n="bi"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <par n="P__ن"/>
        <p>
          <l>می</l>
          <r>می<s n="me"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <par n="P__ن"/>
        <p>
          <l>می<b/></l>
          <r>می<s n="me"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <par n="P__ن"/>
        <p>
          <l>ﺏ</l>
          <r>ﺏ<s n="bi"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>من</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>تو</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>او</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- him or her -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>وی</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ما</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>شما</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>شماها</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>آن‌ها</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>آنها</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>آنان</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- human only -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ایشان</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>خودم</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>خودت</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>خودش</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>خودمان</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>خودتان</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>خودشان</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>این</l>
          <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>اینان</l>
          <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>آن</l>
          <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l><b/>اون</l>
          <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="همه__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>همه</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="خود__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>خود</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="خویش__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>خویش</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="خویشتن__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>خویشتن</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="واین__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>واین</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="وان__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وان</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="آنجا__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>آنجا</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="انجا__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>انجا</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="personal subject pronouns"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><a/></r>
      </p>
      <par n="numeros"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="separa"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="coma"/>
    </e>
